zh-TW: 化學等級: 食物; 實驗室; 製藥; 試劑; 其他
cs: Jakostní třída chemikálie: Jídlo; Laboratorní; Farmaceutické; Činidlo; Jiné
nl: Chemische kwaliteit: Voedsel; Laboratorium; Farmaceutisch; Reagens; Andere
zh-CN: 化学等级: 食物; 实验室; 医药; 试剂; 其他
en: Chemical grade: Food; Laboratory; Pharmaceutical; Reagent; Other
pt-BR: Grau químico: Comida; Laboratório; Farmacêutico; Reagente; Outro
tr: Kimyasal Sınıf: Yiyecek; Laboratuvar; Eczacılıkla ilgili; Reaksiyon; Diğer
th: เกรดสารเคมี: อาหาร; ห้องทดลอง; เภสัชกรรม; การสังเคราะห์ทางเคมี; อื่นๆ
ja: ケミカルグレード: 食べ物; ラボラトリー; 医薬品; 試薬; その他
ru: Тип химического вещества: Пища; Лаборатория; Фармацевтическая; Реагент; Другое
bg-BG: Химически клас: Храна; Лаборатория; Фармацевтични; Реагент; Други
fr: Qualité chimique: Nourriture; Laboratoire; Pharmaceutical; Réactif; Autre
sk-SK: Chemická trieda: Jedlo; Laboratórium; Farmaceutický; Činidlo; Iné
vi: Cấp hoá chất: Đồ ăn; Phòng thí nghiệm; Dược phẩm; Thuốc thử; Khác
lt-LT: Cheminė kokybės klasė: Maistas; Laboratorija; Farmacija; Reagentas; Kita
hr-HR: Kemijski razred: Hrana; Laboratorij; Farmaceutski; Reagens; Ostalo
nb: Kjemisk kvalitet: Mat; Laboratorie; Farmasøytisk; Reagens; Annet
da: Kemisk kvalitet: Mad; Laboratorium; Farmaceutisk; Reagens; Andet
de: Chemische Qualität: Lebensmittel; Labor; Pharmaceutical; Reagens; Sonstiges
fi: Kemikaaliluokka: Ruoka; Laboratorio; Farmaseuttinen; Reagenssi; Muu
es: Grado químico: Comida; Laboratorio; Farmacéutico; Reactivo; Otros
hu: Vegyszer besorolása: Élelmiszer; Laboratórium; Gyógyszerészeti; Reagens; Egyéb
ko: 화학 등급: 식품; 실험실; 의약품; 시약; 기타
sl-SI: Kemijski razred: Hrana; Laboratorijski; Farmacevtski; Reagent; Drugo
ro-RO: Clasificare ca produs chimic: Alimentar; Laborator; Farmaceutic; Reactiv; Altele
pt-PT: Grau químico: Bens alimentares; Laboratório; Farmácia; Reagente; Outro
el: Βαθμός χημικής καθαρότητας: Τροφές; Εργαστήριο; Φαρμακευτική βιομηχανία; Αντιδραστήριο; Άλλο
it: Grado chimico: Alimenti; Laboratorio; Farmaceutico; Reagente; Altro
sv: Kemisk kvalitet: Mat; Laboratorium; Farmaceutisk; Reagens; Övrigt
pl: Klasa chemiczna: Żywność; Laboratoryjne; Farmaceutyczne; Odczynnik; Inne